Utah statutes.
78A-6-209.   Court records -- Inspection.

(1)  The court and the probation department shall keep records as required by the board and the presiding judge.

(2)  Court records shall be open to inspection by:

(a)  the parents or guardian of a child, a minor who is at least 18 years of age, other parties in the case, the attorneys, and agencies to which custody of a minor has been transferred;

(b)  for information relating to adult offenders alleged to have committed a sexual offense, a felony or class A misdemeanor drug offense, or an offense against the person under Title 76, Chapter 5, Offenses Against the Person, the State Office of Education for the purpose of evaluating whether an individual should be permitted to obtain or retain a license as an educator or serve as an employee or volunteer in a school, with the understanding that the office must provide the individual with an opportunity to respond to any information gathered from its inspection of the records before it makes a decision concerning licensure or employment;

(c)  the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division, established in Section 53-10-103, for the purpose of a criminal history background check for the purchase of a firearm and establishing good character for issuance of a concealed firearm permit as provided in Section 53-5-704;

(d)  the Division of Child and Family Services for the purpose of Child Protective Services Investigations in accordance with Sections 62A-4a-403 and 62A-4a-409 and administrative hearings in accordance with Section 62A-4a-1009;

(e)  for information related to a juvenile offender who has committed a sexual offense, a felony, or an offense that if committed by an adult would be a misdemeanor, the Department of Health for the purpose of evaluating under the provisions of Subsection 26-39-404(3) whether a licensee should be permitted to obtain or retain a license to provide child care, with the understanding that the department must provide the individual who committed the offense with an opportunity to respond to any information gathered from its inspection of records before it makes a decision concerning licensure; and

(f)  for information related to a juvenile offender who has committed a sexual offense, a felony, or an offense that if committed by an adult would be a misdemeanor, the Department of Health to determine whether an individual meets the background screening requirements of Title 26, Chapter 21, Part 2, Clearance for Direct Patient Access, with the understanding that the department must provide the individual who committed the offense an opportunity to respond to any information gathered from its inspection of records before it makes a decision under that part.

(3)  With the consent of the judge, court records may be inspected by the child, by persons having a legitimate interest in the proceedings, and by persons conducting pertinent research studies.

(4)  If a petition is filed charging a minor 14 years of age or older with an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, the court shall make available to any person upon request the petition, any adjudication or disposition orders, and the delinquency history summary of the minor charged unless the records are closed by the court upon findings on the record for good cause.

(5)  Probation officers' records and reports of social and clinical studies are not open to inspection, except by consent of the court, given under rules adopted by the board.

(6) (a)  Any juvenile delinquency adjudication or disposition orders and the delinquency history summary of any person charged as an adult with a felony offense shall be made available to any person upon request.

(b)  This provision does not apply to records that have been destroyed or expunged in accordance with court rules.

(c)  The court may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs associated with retrieving a requested record that has been archived.



Amended by Chapter 328, 2012 General Session

